FORGE

Syntax: forge <weapon>

Using this skill, you might forge a weapon improving it's stats. The higher 
your level is, the bigger improvement you'll make. You can forge the 
weapon as many times as you wish but if you fail during forge, you might 
break or destroy the weapon. Forging depends upon your skill and knowledge
in that type of weapons.

"Forge me a sword, for I need to defend     
Against those who'll come seeking my head. 
And we'll fight 'till the inescapable end, 
That leaves one alive, and one dead."
#
FLY

Usage       : cast 'fly' <victim>

Just what you'd think this spell would do, it lets you fly.

See also: LAND, LEVITATE, WATERWALK
#
FORTRESS

Usage: cast 'fortress'

This extremly powerful spell will throw every defensive spell you
know, in only one cast. For each defensive spell, you must be five
levels above the level you attained it, and must have practiced it
to at least superb level.
#
"ACID BLAST"

Usage: cast 'acid blast' <victim>

This spell inflicts damage on the victim by magically generating a
deadly blast of acid.  One victim once said 'Whoa!' before his mouth was
melted down.  It turned ugly after that for the poor goblin.

Using this spell, powerful mage will deal out (level*2)d4+level hitpoints of 
damage, and leaving his victim covered in acid, if it survives.

See also: CLEAR
#
"ANIMATE DEAD"

Usage       : cast 'animate dead' <corpse>

This spell creates a zombie or similar undead creature out of a corpse.  
This undead creature is under the caster's command for a certain amount of 
time depending on characters inteligence and charisma.
#
"AREA EARTHQUAKE"

Usage: cast 'area eathquake' 

This is a MULTI spell.
This is improved version of EARTHQUAKE spell. Upon casting it, the ground 
will split into four directions and damage everything that comes on the 
way. The spell won't hurt flying characters. Damage done by this spell is 
5d(total_group_level). 

See also: MULTI
#
"ARROW RAIN"

Usage: cast 'arrow rain' 

This spell causes all manner of wooden splinters that litter the ground
to take flight with unerring accuracy hiting everything in the room;
these improvised missiles are most often wood, which is in tune with
the ranger's nature and woodslore, but anything handy will work, so
the spell is effective even within the bowels of the earth, where the
spell utilizes small fragments of stone.
#
"ART OF COMBAT"

Usage: automatic

After years of combat experience, every warrior realizes that fight is not 
all about offense, but good defense. Finalizing their lessons in combat 
tactics, every warrior at the end understands the true art of combat. 
In game terms, this skill will raise warrior's chances to successfuly 
dodge, parry or block opponent's attack.
#
"ASTRAL PROJECTION"

Usage: cast 'astral projection' 

Upon casting this spell, druid will temporary leave his body. That will 
allow you to scan your surroundings from a much higher place getting some 
valuable information. The area scaned is proportional to the height you 
project yourself, which is dependant upon your level.
For more information see help on MAP. Note that you will project whole 
terrain that you can see form upwards, unlike the MAP skill. You will need 
some kind of paper to write it all down.
#
"BLADE BARRIER"

Usage : cast 'blade barrier'

This spell will create a barrier of swords arround the caster damaging
everyone in the room for 8D8 +level.
#
"BUDDHA FINGER"

This special skill allows monk to concentrate and then channel his
inner energy through his finger doing damage equivalent to his vitality. 
The entire process will take the half of the monk's vitality.
#
"BURNING HANDS"

Usage       : cast 'burning hands' <victim>
Damage      : 1d4+lev

When the wizard casts this spell, a jet of searing flame shoots 
from his fingertips causing his foes much discomfort.

See Also: CHILL TOUCH
#
"CALL LIGHTNING"

Usage       : cast 'call lightning' <victim>

This powerful spell of higher level clerics allows them to call down the
wrath of their deity in the form of a bolt of lightning.  This spell only
works outside, for this force cannot be tapped unless under the heavens. It 
also has to be raining (or worse). The lightning will inflict levelD5+level 
points of damage.
 
See also:  WEATHER, CONTROL WEATHER
#
"CHAIN LIGHTNING"

Usage : cast 'chain lightning'

An even more advanced spell than lightning bolt, chain lightning
harnesses a greater amount of electrical energy to a more hazardous, and
even less predictable, effect.  When discharged, chain lightning looses
itself upon an area, and may strike anything or anyone present in the
immediate area!  Needless to say, a weapon harnessed with care and by only 
the most powerful of druids. Actual damage done is around 12d(level/2).
#
CHARGE
                       
Usage: charge <target>
                       
It is only the most seasoned of warriors who are able to enter the fray
of battle with a charge at their foe!

Usually the battle is started by dealing one blow to the enemy. Warrior 
with charge skill will be able to hit their opponent multiple times (up to 
six times when all attacks are mastered) in the initial round of combat.

"The brave shall be remembered."
#
"CHARM PERSON"

Usage       : cast 'charm person' <victim>
Accumulative: No

Is is not possible to charm anyone that is already charmed, if
you're charmed yourself, or if the person is higher level than
yourself. The person will get a saving throw versus "paralysation".

A charmed person will follow you, and not be able to attack you, you
can order charmed person using the order command.

See Also: FOLLOW ORDER
#
"CHILL TOUCH"

Usage       : cast 'chill touch' <victim>
Accumulative: duration

The most basic of all cold attack spells, the caster holds out a hand,
palm upright, and using a few words of power forces the air between the
palm and the caster's opponent to became painfully, destructively cold. 
This spell is more powerful than the magic missile spell. A victim failing 
its saving throw will get its strength reduced by one and will take 
1d8+1+level/8 hitpoints of damage.

See Also: MAGIC MISSILE
#
"COLD ARROW"

Usage: cast 'cold arrow' <victim>

Upon casting this spell a small cold arrow will hit your opponent doing 
8d(level/2)+level points of damage and leave it freezing.

See also: FLAME ARROW, WARM
#
"COLORSPRAY" "COLOR SPRAY"

Usage       : cast 'color spray' <victim>

This spell fires a beam of rainbow colors at the poor subject of the 
spell. This spell is more powerful than the lightning bolt spell. It will 
inflict 6dlevel hitpoints of damage to your opponent.

See Also: LIGHTNING BOLT

For help on actual color, see:  ANSI
#
"ENHANCED DAMAGE"

Usage: automatic

Warriors can become skilled enough in combat that they are able to inflict
more damage than other classes.  Enhanced damage is checked for with each hit,
although with a low skill, the chance of receiving a bonus
is very low indeed. 

"Battle doesn't need a purpose; the battle is its own purpose. You
don't ask why a plague spreads or a field burns. Don't ask why I
fight." - the black knight.
#
"CONE OF COLD"

Usage: cast 'cone of cold'

This spell summons a cone shapes ray of cold to shoot from the casters 
hand at all people not grouped in the room.  The force of the cold is so 
much that it will do 20d5+2*level hitpoints of damage.
It will also cause victim to freeze.
#
"CONJURE ELEMENTAL"

Usage       : cast 'conjure elemental'
 
This spell summons a being from one of the Elemental Planes and charms it 
for a certain amount of time depending on characters inteligence and 
charisma.

Other spells to note: ANIMATE DEAD, CLONE, GATE
#
"CONTROL WEATHER"

Usage       : cast 'control weather' ('better' | 'worse')
Accumulative: Yes

This spell will change the "course" of the current weather.
Exmample:

> cast 'control wea' worse

See Also: -
#
"COUNTER ATTACK"

A counter attack is performed after a successful parry, where the defender 
parries an attack and counterattacks, striking the attacker.  A somewhat 
difficult action to perform, it takes years of experience, incredible 
dexterity, and the shrewedness to read an attacker's movements and counter 
them accordingly.
#
"COVER TRACKS"

After years of living in the woods, ranger can learn the skill of covering 
his or her tracks, making them impossible to track.
While covering tracks you'll use some extra movement points. You can stop 
anytime typing 'cover !'
#
"CREATE RAIN"

Usage: cast 'create rain' 

This is a MULTI spell.
This spell will instanly turn weather bad, and create rain. Useful when you 
are about to fight a fire dragon for example, or you get caught by fireball 
sent by some mad Mage.

See also: MULTI
#
"CREATE SPRING"

Usage: cast 'create spring' 

This spell brings forth a magical spring from the ground, which has the
same properties as a fountain.

#
"CRITICAL HIT"

 Sometimes in battle, even the most disciplined fighters go into an mode of
fighting based purely on instinct and half-clear images that buzz through
their psyche like silver arrows streaking through the night.  Through
immense training and experience they are able to take advantage of this
mode of fighting and find even the smallest crack in the enemy's defenses.
If successful, without even thinking, they can aim for this strategic 
weak-spot and do an extraordinary amount of damage to their opponent.
 How often you are able to critically hit a person is determined by 
difference in intelligence and in level between you and the victim.
#
"_CURE BLIND"

Usage       : cast 'cure blind' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Instantaneous

This minor cantrip can prove very effective and useful for with this simple 
charm the cleric/druid uses the power of his deities to remove all forms of 
affliction to the sight which may oppress either himself or a party member.
#
"_CURE CRITIC"

Usage       : cast 'cure critic' <victim>
Duration    : Instantaneous

This spell cures 3d8+level-6 hitpoints of damage.

See Also: -
#
"_CURE DRUNK"

Usage: cast 'cure drunk' <target>

Self explaning.
#
"_CURE LIGHT"

Usage       : cast 'cure light' <victim>
Duration    : Instantaneous

This spell cures 1d8+level/3 hitpoints of damage.

See Also: CURE SERIOUS, CURE CRITIC, HEAL, POWER HEAL
#
"_CURE PLAGUE"

Usage: cast 'cure plague' <target>

This is used to cure disease from the target.
#
"_CURE SERIOUS"

Usage: cast 'cure serious' <victim>

This spell will cure 2d8+level/2 hitpoints.

See also: CURE LIGHT
#
"DEATH DANCE"

Usage       : cast 'death dance' <victim>

The dance of death is the most powerful and most dangerous spell/skill
within the lands.  First, the benefit of death dance:  while under
the influence of the death dance, the character gains additional attacks
1 up to 1/12 of his or her current level.  The character also receives a
bonus on damage (in addition to enhanced damage, if that applies) of up to 
halfe of the damage done. 
However, the character suffers from the following:  The initial cost of
'death dance' is half of the characters' hit points.  If this causes the
character to die, then he or she has finally pushed themself over the
edge.  The 'death dance' also costs one fourth of the character's
movement.  While under the death dance, the character does not regenerate
hit points, mana, or movement.
Do not cast this spell if the victim is under the influence of HASTE.
#
"DEFLECTION SHIELD"

Usage: cast 'deflection shield'

This potent spell creates a magical deflection shield around casters that 
will fully deflect some damage to the attacker during the fight. 

See also: GROUP DEFLECTION SHIELD
#
"SENSE ALIGNMENT"

Usage       : prayfor 'sense alignment'

In the real world there is nearly no black and white, just many shades of
grey.  Consequently, it is often  nearly impossible to guess the alignment
of those around you.  By the casting of this spell, you ask your deity for
divine guidance by surrounding all you encounter with a red aura if they
are evil, and a blue if they follow the path of goodness.
#
"DETECT INVISIBILITY"

Usage       : cast 'detect invisibility' <victim>

This spell enables you to see invisible items and players.

See Also: DETECT MAGIC, DETECT ALIGN, DETECT POISON
#
"DETECT MAGIC"

Usage       : cast 'detect magic'

his spell, a fundamental part of any mage's repetoire, heightens his or
her senses to the point where the mage may detect whether a magical aura
exists around a particular item.

See Also: DETECT ALIGN, DETECT INVIS, DETECT POISON
#
"DETECT POISON"

Usage       : cast 'detect poison' (victim | food | drink)

Cast on food or drinks (drink containers) you will be able to
sense if it is poisoned.

Cast on a person you will be able to see if that person is
poisoned.

See Also: DETECT MAGIC, DETECT INVIS, DETECT ALIGN
#
"DIMENSION WALK"

Usage: cast 'dimension walk' <victim>

This powerful spell is similar to SUMMON but only it will transfer you to 
your victim. This spell will open a portal between you and the desired 
creature allowing you to instantly teleport to it. The spell will fail if 
your victim is in peaceful, private, tunnel or nomagic room.

See also: SUMMON
#
"DISPEL EVIL"

Usage       : prayfor 'dispel evil' [target]>

This prayer invokes the wrath of your deity on an evil victim. For this prayer 
to inflict damage (levelD7) you must be very careful, and use it only if 
your alignment is good.

'Good is going to triumph over evil just as soon as it learns to fight
dirtier.' - Jesse Custer 
#
"SMITE EVIL"

Usage       : prayfor 'smite evil' [target]

This prayer invokes the wrath of your deity on an evil victim and is twice
as powerful as dispel evil prayer. For this prayer to inflict damage (levelD14)
you must be very careful, and use it only if  your alignment is good.

'Good just got more powerful.'                             
#
"SMITE GOOD"

Usage       : prayfor 'smite good' [target]

This prayer invokes the wrath of your deity on a good victim and is twice
as powerful as dispel good prayer. For this prayer to inflict damage (levelD14)
you must be very careful, and use it only if  your alignment is evil.

'Good just got more powerful.'                             
#
"DISPEL GOOD"

Usage       : prayfor 'dispel good' [target]

This prayer invokes the wrath of your deity on a good victim. For this prayer 
to inflict damage (levelD7), you must be very careful, and use it only if 
your alignment is evil.
#
"DISPEL MAGIC"

Usage: cast 'dispel magic' <victim | object >

When a wizard cast this spell, it has a chance to neutralize or 
negate magic it comes in contact with. This spell can remove magical 
curses and effect from a player, and magical forces of objects in the 
caster's inventory. When cast on a friendly player it will remove all of 
the spell affects upon him. Else it is considered an aggresive spell, and 
it may remove some of the spell affects of the mob. 
#
"DRAGON STRIKE"

This skill is used by high level Monks and is known for the unpredictable 
amount of damage that it will do. There were cases of skillful monks 
killing a dragon with such strike.
#
"DUAL BACKSTAB"

Usage: backstab <target>

It is similar to BACKSTAB, only you'll use both of your daggers (if you are
wielding two). 
#
"DUAL WIELD"

Usage    : automatic

This skill is something that allows a you to wield two weapons at
once. Generally this means a smaller/lighter weapon in the holding hand. In 
combat you will try to use both of your weapons now, making you more 
formidable opponent. 

"Behold! There do I see my mother, my brothers and my sisters!"
#
"EAGLE EYE"

Usage: cast 'eagle eye' <target>

After spending much time in the wilderness, rangers oft become accustomed
to the ways of the animals and beasts within.  By means of this spell,
rangers are able to unite their consciousness for the briefest of moments
with an eagle to search the land for a person while the eagle searches for
its prey.
#
"ELBOW SWING" "KNEE THRUST"

Usage: elbow <victim>
       knee  <victim>

This skills allow ranger to perform one extra attack doing some large 
damage to his opponent. Knee thrust is more powerful then elbow swing but 
costs more movement to perform too. 

#
"ENCHANT ARMOR"

Usage: cast 'enchant armor' <object>
Duration: Permament

This spell will enchant armor. Total improvements are:

AC           : level/6  + (-1..1)
SAVE vs SPELL: level/10 + (-1..1)
#
"ENCHANT WEAPON"

Usage       : cast 'enchant weapon' <weapon>
Duration    : Permanent

This spell will enchant non-magical (non-modifying) weapons only.
By non-modifying weapons we refer to weapons that might alter any
ability such as for example damage. The only way to know if a weapon
is suitable for enchantment is to fully identify it.

The enchantment will modify the weapon as:

    Hit Roll	(-1..1) + (your level / 10)
    Damage	(-1..1) + (your level / 10)

See Also: ENCHANT ARMOR, FORGE, HAMMERING
#
"ENERGY CONTAINMENT"

Usage: cast 'energy containment' 

Upon casting this spell, high level druid will create an cloud of energy 
containment, which will provide him with extra 150 vitality points that will
last for five hours.
#
"ENHANCED HIT" "ENHANCED MANA" "ENHANCED MOVE"

Usage: enhanced 'hit | mana | move' <target>

This spells will allow your target to regenerate faster than usual.
#
"ENHANCED SIGHT"

Enhanced sight will allow you to look more further when you look in some 
direction. For example when you 'look north' you might be able to see up to 
3 rooms away, depending how good you've learned this skill. It will also 
affect your SCAN range.


#
"EVASIVE FIGHTING" "AGGRESIVE FIGHTING"

Evasive fighting style will allow you more defensive role in combat, thus
lowering the chance of you being hit damaged.
Opposite to that, aggresive fighting will make you more aggresive towards
your opponent which will result in more damage made by you, but also will
make you more vulnarable to attacks.

You can change your fighting style with "style" command.
#
"FAERIE FIRE"

Usage: cast 'faerie fire' <victim>

When this spell is cast, the caster outlines the victim in a pale
glowing light.  While the faerie fire does not itself inflict harm
upon the victim, it increases the victim's armor class making the victim 
easier to hit.
#
"FAERIE FOG

Usage: cast 'faerie fog' 

The caster of this spell creates a large volume of purple smoke to spew 
forth from his or her fingertips.  This smoke will reveal the presence of 
any  invisible people in the room, provided they fail a saving throw vs. 
spells.
It does not reveal hidden people.
#
"FEIGN DEATH"

Usage: feign 

Use of this skill allows you to fall into a coma-like state which stops 
fighting since it appears that you are dead to your opponent. Great 
opportunity for a second or even third backstab. 
#
"FIRE BREATH" "GAS BREATH" "FROST BREATH" "ACID BREATH" "LIGHTNING BREATH"

Upon casting it, caster will breath deadly supstance into the room
damaging everyone in it. 
Damage:

Lightning - 18d10+6dlevel
Fire      - 15d10+5dlevel  (can burn items)
Frost     - 8d10+level     (can freeze items)
Gas       - 12d10+4dlevel  (can blind or poison)
Acid      - 20D12+7delevel (can corrode armor)

See also: EXTINGUISH, SPELLS
#
"FIRE SHIELD"

Usage: cast 'fire shield' 

A potent spell, recently arrived to the continent from distant lands. 
The target of this enchantment becomes engulfed in leaping flames of
burning blue and white-hot amethyst.  While he himself cannot feel the
raging heat give off by this globe of crackling flame, those which try to
do damage to his person must penetrate the flames in order to reach him.
Anyone who steps to close will be automaticly punished by a fireball.


See also: GROUP FIRE SHIELD
#
"FIST OF DOOM"

Syntax: fist <target>

Skillful monk may use this skill to instantly kill a mob (or another 
player). It will do 40 points of damage per level difference between you 
and the target for minimum of 5*level and maximum of 1000 points of damage. 
Note then you can use the fist of doom anytime during the fight but your 
target must not be fighting as they will be too aware. 
#
"FLAME ARROW"

Usage: cast 'flame arrow' <victim>

Upon casting this spell a flame arrow will hit your foe doing
12d(level/2)+2*level points of damage and leaving him covered in flames.

See also: COLD ARROW, EXTINGUISH
#
"FORCE FIELD"

Usage: cast 'force field' 

This spell creates a electrical field around you, giving you solid 
protecion and punishing everyone who steps to close with an extra bolt of 
lightining.

See also: GROUP FORCE FIELD
#
"GIANT STRENGTH"

Usage: cast 'giant strength' <targer>

This spell will increase target's strength by 3 points.

See also: STRENGTH
#
"GIVE LIFE"

Usage: cast 'give life' <target>

This is a MULTI spell.
This spell will improve victim's max hitpoints by (total_group_level)*4 for 
duration of (total_group_level)/100 hours. The target can be placed 
anywhere in the world.

See also: MULTI
#
"MAJOR PROTECTION"

Usage: prayfor 'major protection' [target]

Next in line of protective prayers, major protection allows the priest
to call for protection prayer on their companion while reducing the damage
inflicted even more.

"Faith's shield is hammered out by the blows of unbelievers." -Oracle en-Vec
#
"GREATER ENCHANT"

High level mages can learn this skill to enhance to power of their
enchanting spells. The effect may be quite unpredictable and it will often
take repeated attempts to get the best result.
#
"GROUP BREATHE WATER"

Usage: cast 'group breathe water' 

Your entire group will suddenly be able of breathing underwater!

See also: WATERBREATHE
#
"GROUP DEFLECTION SHIELD"

Usage: cast 'group deflection shield' 

It will bring a deflection shield around your entire group.

See also: DEFLECTION SHIELD
#
"GROUP FIRE SHIELD"

Usage: cast 'group fire shield' 

This powerful spell will protect your entire group with the flaming shield, 
punishing everyono who enters it with a raging fireball.

See also: FIRE SHIELD
#
"GROUP FORCE FIELD"

Usage: cast 'group force field' 

This powerful spell will protect you entire group with a electrical force 
field punishing everyone who touches it with a lightning bolt.

See also: FORCE FIELD
#
"GROUP HEAL"

Usage       : cast 'group heal'

This spell gives what is essentially a heal spell to all of the caster's 
group members. 

See also:  GROUP
Other spells to note: HEAL
#
"GROUP INVISIBILITY"

Usage: cast 'group invisibility' 

You entire group will slowly fade out of existance.
#
"GROUP POWER HEAL"

Usage: cast 'group power heal' 

Self explaining.

See also: HEAL
#
"GROUP RECALL"

Usage: cast 'group recall'

This potent spell will transfer your entire group to the current sanctuary 
(Temple of Midgaard or the Clan start rooms).
#
GUARD

Usage: guard <target>
Stats: DEX

After years of combat experience and rescuing, fighter may learn the 
more advanced skill of guarding.
This skill will allow you to perform automatic rescue of your friend
should they get into any trouble. The chance to successfully guard depends
upon you skill and dexterity. Chances lower as the number of enemies you
are already fighting increases.

Any number of warriors can be set to guard one person, increasing the
probability to successfully guard them.

To stop guarding just type 'guard' without arguments.

See also: RESCUE
#
"GUST OF WIND"

Usage: cast 'gust of wind' <victim>

This spell will create a sudden gust of wind that might blow your victim 
out of the room. The chances are smaller if your victim is heavier. This 
spell is not aggressive.
#
"HAND OF GOD"

Usage: cast 'hand of god'

Upon casting this spell, cleric will attain it's God's attention for the
duration of next two hours. During that time, cleric may experience strange
force overhelming it's hand, making him hit 3d3 times harder. This can
happen more often with the cleric's wisdom being higher.
#
"HOLD MONSTER"

Usage : cast 'hold monster' <victim>

This powerfull spell will prevent monster from moving around including 
fleeing from battle. It is somewhat similar to PETRIFY, but the moster will 
still be able to fight back.

See also: PETRIFY
#
"HOLY ARMOR"

Usage       : cast 'holy armor' <target>
Accumulative: Yes

By means of this spell, the cleric creates a magical field of force that 
servers as if it were an extra layer of armor lowering target's AC by 50.

See Also: AC
#
"HOLY AURA"

Usage: cast 'holy aura'

This is the most powerful defensive spell a cleric can use on itself. 
The Gods will grant you with a shimmering, protective aura around your body 
which will absorb large amounts of damage you would otherwise receive. The 
duration of this spell is one hour.
#
"IMPROVE STAT"

Usage: cast 'improve stat' <victim>

This is one of the most powerful spells of them all. Not many talk about it 
so not much is known. You can use it to improve someone's stat, for ever. 
However you can do it only once as the amount of energy and concentration 
needed for the spell is likely to be conceed only once.
#
"IMPROVED STEAL" "STEAL MASTERY"

Usage: automatic

Thieves skilled enough in 'steal mastery' may steal equiped items on mobs or
players if they are sleeping or stunned. However, failing a steal will
probably wake your victim up.

"What do you have, that I can not obtain?"
#
"LEECH LIFE"

Usage       : cast 'leech life' <victim>

This spell saps hit points from the victim. It will damage it for levelD5 
hitpoints, but you will also leech half of those and use it to heal 
yourself!

#
"LIGHTNING BOLT"

Usage       : cast 'lightning bolt' <victim>


A very potent, damaging spell useable by only the more experienced of
magi. While lightning tends to be a bit unpredictable, this potent spell is 
raw and known for its capacity to inflicting incredible harm. Upon casting 
this spell, the wizard releases a powerful stroke of electrical energy that 
inflicts levelD5 points of damage.
If victim is protected from lightning the damage is lowered by up to half.
#
"LOCAL TELEPORT"

Usage: cast 'local teleport' <victim>

With this spell you can teleport yourself or another player somewhere near 
in the zone. The location is random but will not include any death traps.
Unlike the TELEPORT spell, you can cast this even during the combat, to
rescue yourself (although you might end just under the red dragon with
50 hitpoints spare :)

See Also: TELEPORT
#
"LOCATE CREATURE"

Usage       : cast 'locate creature' <name>
 
If possible you will know exactly where a creature is.  If more than one 
creature by the same name exists, you will get a listing of several creatures.  
#
"LOCATE OBJECT"

Usage       : cast 'locate object' <object>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

If possible you will know exactly where an object is, or the
name of the person using it. If more than one object by the
same name exists, you will get a listing of several objects.
The maximum number of objects you can simultaneously locate is
higher as your level is.

See Also: LOCATE CREATURE
#
"MAGIC MISSILE"

Usage       : cast 'magic missile' <victim>

This is the least powerful offensive magic user spell. Actual damage done 
by this spell is 1d8+level/8.

See Also: MYSTIC SHIELD
#
"MAGICAL PROTECTION"

Usage: cast 'magical protection' 

The spell will provide a mage with good protection against magical attacks.
#
"MAP TERRAIN"

This skill will allow a ranger to quickly explore his surroundings, drawing
the map of the terrain. You'll explore every direction from your current 
location, stoping there  when you can't progress further for any reason 
(water, closed door...),  marking those locations by '!' on the map. The 
area coverage is larger as  your skill is more practiced. You will not 
explore up and down exits. Note that you will need a piece of paper to draw 
the map. The map will not save when you quit.

Map legend:
-----------
 % - Inside
 @ - City or road
 + - Fields or path
 # - Forest
 ^ - Hills and mountains
 ~ - Water
 = - Desert, lava or artic terrain

 * - Your present location
 ! - You came upon a closed exit
 ? - Unknown (could be anything of the above)

See also: MIDGAARD
#
"MASS CHARM"

Usage: cast 'mass charm'

This is area version of charm person spell and has exactly the same 
affects with the difference that it can be used in battle to.

See also: CHARM PERSON
#
"MASS SLEEP"

Usage: cast 'mass sleep' 


Mage can use this spell, even in battle, to sleep all the creatures in the 
room.
#
"MELLON COLLIE"

Usage: cast 'mellon collie' <victim>

Well practiced druid can use this spell to make his victim suffer terrible 
depression. It will lower the victim's hitroll by 5 making it hit less 
often. It will also lower the victim's dexterity by three making it's 
agility wither. And at the end it will lower the victim's resistance to  
magical attacks making it much more sensitive to your damagind spells.
#
"METEOR SWARM"

Usage: cast 'meteor swarm'

Upon casting this powerful spell, caster conjures millions of tiny 
meteorites and swarms his opponents. It will inflict everyone in the room 
for levelD8+level hitpoints of damage.
#
"MIRROR IMAGE"

Usage: cast 'mirror image' 

This spell will allow you to split into many all-alike images confusing 
your enemy during the battle.In order to successfuly fool 
your opponent you must have high intelligence.
#
"MOVE HIDDEN"

Usage: movehidden

When you HIDE yourself and then move somewhere you would usually get 
exposed again. If you have practiced well MOVE HIDDEN, you'll still remain 
hidden when you move or act. While moving hidden, you'll be using
more movement points, depending how much you know the skill.

You can stop it by typing 'visible'.
#
"MYSTIC SHIELD"

Usage: cast 'mystic shield' <target>

This spell creates an invisible field around its target which, depending
on level, has the increasing potential to bend the physical world around
the mage. It will lower your AC by 15 and also will give you total 
protection against some low-level spells such as MAGIC MISSILE, CHILL TOUCH 
and BURNING HANDS.
#
"OMNI EYE"

Usage: cast 'omni eye'

This spell will allow you to get information of where all the players you 
can see are and what is their condition.
#
"PICK LOCKS"

Usage: pick <object>

Lock picking is one of the prime skills of thieves, allowing them to gain
access to many secured areas.  Lock picking chances are improved by  
intelligence, and hindered by the difficulty of the lock. 
Not all locks can be picked.

> pick door
> pick safe

See Also : OPEN, CLOSE, LOCK, UNLOCK
#
"POWER BLOW"

Usage: automatic during the fight

This is the most powerful skills available to monks. During the fight, monk 
will gather all of his extra energy and at one moment release it doing 
terrible damage to his opponent. The more intelligent and agile you are the 
more often you'll be dealing power blows out.
#
"POWER HEAL"

Usage: cast 'power heal' <victim>

This is the most powerful healing spell you can cast on someone. It will 
immediatly boost victim's hitpoints by 300.

See also: HEAL, GROUP POWER HEAL
#
"POWER OF NATURE"

Usage: cast 'power of nature'

The Power of Nature is the ultimate spell a Druid can call to. Upon casting 
it, you will make a little demonstration what a Mother Nature still can do. 
It will inflict damage to everyone in the room. The actual damage done is:
         
           (level/2)d(level/2)+MAX(level, 5*(level-victim))
#
"POWER WORD"

Usage       : cast 'power word'

This powerful spell is the ultimate spell that a cleric can attain.  It 
will do severe damage (levelD7) to everybody in the room with  2*level 
bonus if caster's alignment is extreme (God's child or Evil Incarnate).
After casting this spell all creatures in the room will stop fighting
and calmly sit on the ground waiting to see your next move.
#
"PRIMAL FEAR"

Usage       : cast 'primal fear'

Powerful druid are able to instill fear in their opponents, despite
their relatively unintimidating appearance.
Upon casting this spell, the caster radiates an aura of fear into the room, 
causing creatures that don't save their throw versus paralyzation to flee. 
Those who do not flee might even decide to attack the caster. 

#
"PRISMATIC SPHERE"

Usage: cast 'prismatic sphere' <victim>

This is a MULTI spell.
This spell will create prismatic sphere of light around the victim leaving 
it TOTALY invulnarable for the next hour, with a 50% chance the spell will
wear off during that hour. Victim can be placed anywhere in the world.

See also: MULTI, AURA

#
PROTECTION

Usage: prayfor 'protection' [target]

This prayer offers more protection then the minor protection prayer.
Once learned, the priest will be able to call for minor protection for their
companions.

"The willow knows what the storm does not: that the power to endure
harm outlives the power to inflict it."
#
"_PROTECT FROM COLDNESS"

Usage: cast 'protect from coldness' <victim>

When this spell is cast, the person calls upon their deity to protect
them from the element of cold.  As a result, the damage taken from
this type of attack is reduced by a significant amount.

#
"_PROTECT FROM FIRE"

Usage       : cast 'prot from fire' <target>

When this spell is cast, the person calls upon their deity to protect
them from the element of fire.  As a result, the damage taken from this
type of attack is reduced by a significant amount.
#
"_PROTECT FROM LIGHTNING"

Usage: cast 'protect from lightning' <victim>

When this spell is cast, the person calls upon their deity to protect
them from the element of eletricity.  As a result, the damage taken from
this type of attack is reduced by a significant amount.
#
"QUICK CHANT"

The skill reduces time needed to cast a spell and a lag after casting. It 
will allow skillful mage to for example cast several fireballs in a row, 
which is not a pleasent thing to see. Use of this skill is automatic once 
practiced..
#
"QUIVERING PALM"

This is a basic but yet powerful monk skill allowing him to use palm of his 
hand as a deadly weapon. This skill is automatic during the fight.
#
"RAY OF DISRUPTION"

Usage: cast 'ray of disruption' <victim>

This is a MULTI spell.
The spell will conjure a beam of udescribeble energy and focus it to your 
victim who can be anywhere in the world. The victim has two saving throws, 
each for half the damage. Damage inflicted depends upon the total level of
spellcasters and may go high as the half of the target's hitpoints.
Spell can be cast only of the target has more then two thirds
of it's hitpoints.

See also: MULTI
#
"REMOVE CURSE"

Usage       : cast 'remove curse' <victim | object>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Instantaneous

Will remove a curse on carried objects or any persons in the room. Note 
that in case the victim is wearing cursed object, the spell can't remove 
the curse. In that case the curse must be removed by a victim alone.

See Also: CURSE
#
"REMOVE POISON"

Usage       : cast 'remove poison' <victim | food | drink> 
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Instantaneous

Will remove poison.

See Also: Poison
#
"RETRIEVE CORPSE"

Usage: cast 'retrieve corpse' 

If you have died and lost your corpse, you can locate and cause the corpse 
to appear in the room.
#
"RUNIC SHELTER"

Usage: cast 'runic shelter' 

This spell will create a magical defensive shelter around the druid, giving 
him excellent protecion against magic. The runic shelter will absorb one 
quarter of the incominig magical damage and give you -10 bonus to armor.
#
"SECOND ATTACK"

Usage: automatic

Allows you to possibly attack up to twice a round. 

This skill is automatic, but note that it does not mean you will have
two attacks all the time, every round. It merely gives you a higher
chance of getting in an extra attack.

"Behold! There do I see my father!"
#
"THIRD ATTACK"

Usage: automatic

Allows you to possibly attack up to three times a round. 

"Behold! There do I see the line of my family back to the beginning!"
#
"FOURTH ATTACK"

Usage: automatic

Allows you to possibly attack up to four times a round. 

"... in the halls of Valhalla, where the brave shall live forever!"
#
"SECOND DUAL ATTACK"

Usage: automatic

If you are trained enough in this skill and have high strength, it is 
likely that you will get one more extra attack with your dual-wielded 
weapon.

"They call for me to bid my place among them..."
#
"SENSE LIFE"

Usage       : prayfor 'sense life'

This prayer quickens the senses of the caster, so that he can smell and
even hear the heartbeat of every living creature in the room. With
senses heightened like this, the cleric is able to tell even if a
cleverly hidden thief is in the room.
#
"SHIELD BLOCK"

Usage: automatic

What good is a shield?  Why, to stop things from hitting you, of course.
Shield block does this automatically. If a blow is deflected by shield block,
it does no damage. It is easier to deflect blows with shield then to parry or
dodge them, therefore a bonus is given to shield block attempts. 
#
"SHOCKING GRASP"

Usage       : cast 'shocking grasp' <victim>

Upon casting this spell the wizard develops a powerful electrical charge 
that gives a levelD4 jolt to the creature touched.


#
"SHROUD OF DARKNESS"

Usage: cast 'shorud of darkness' <victim>

High level cleric will use this spell to create a major cloud of darkness 
above his victim, making it very depressed. It will then lower, 
victim's intelligence, dexterity and hitroll by a significant amount.
#
"SHROUD OF OBSCUREMENT"

Usage: cast 'shroud of obscurement' 

This spell will create an obscuring cloud around the mage, making him very 
hard to locate. This applies to EAGLE EYE, CLAIRVOYANCE and OMNI EYE 
spells.
#
"SPELL RECOVERY"

This skill reduces the lag you get when you lose concentration in casting a
spell.  Use of this skill is automatic once practiced..
#
"SPIN KICK"

This skill allows a monk to damage foes currently fighting him.  It does
significantly more damage than kick and can hit more than one opponent. 
It is a tiring skill though.
#
"SPIRITUAL HAMMER"

Usage: prayfor 'spiritual hammer' [target]

Through the casting of this spell, the cleric supplicates his deity to form
a hammer from with which to strike down his enemy.  As the cleric progresses
in levels and becomes closer to his god, he is able to do more damage with
the casting of this spell.
#
"SPRING LEAP"

Allows you to attack from a sitting position, i.e. after you have been
bashed.  You attack, and stand up, all in the same motion.
#
"STRONG MIND"

Usage: cast 'strong mind'

This spell will make you more determined and yoo'll now be able to always 
retreat from the battle, without loosing exp, without throwing your weapon.

See also: ESCAPE
#
"SUMMON ANCIENT DRAGON"

Usage       : cast 'summon ancient dragon'
 
This spell summons an ancient dragon from caves deep in below the surface 
of the Earth. It will serve you for a certain amount of time depending on 
your inteligence and charisma.

Other spells to note: ANIMATE DEAD, CLONE, GATE, CONJURE ELEMENTAL
#
"TIGER CLAW"

Tiger claw is a monk skill allowing them to do significantly more damage
with their bare hands.  You do not need to type anything to use this skill; 
it is automatic during the fight.
#
"ULTRA DAMAGE"

Usage: cast 'ultra damage' <victim>

This is a MULTI spell.
This spell will make the victim deal out 2 times more damage to 
everything for the duration of the spell which is one hour, with a 50%
chance the spell will wear off during that hour. The victim can be 
placed anywhere in the world.

See also: MULTI
#
"WATERBREATHE"

Usage       : cast 'waterbreathe' <victim>

The use of this spell will allow the target to grow two small
gills so that he or she can survive underwater as if in air.  It
does not affect swimming ability, merely the ability to breathe.
#
"WAVE OF HEALING"

Usage: cast 'wave of healing'

This spell will heal your group for 2d10 + level hitpoints.
#
RECALL

Usage       : prayfor 'recall' [target]

While adventuring, dark caverns and magical pathways can often leave a poor
adventurer off in some strange land with no idea which way leads home. This
prayer calls upon the power of cleric's deity to bring him or his companions
safely home.
#
"WRATH OF EARTH"

Usage: cast 'wrath of earth' <victim>

With this potent spell, the druid will call the wrath of the Earth upon his 
victim. After that, for the duration of the spell, the victim won't 
regenerate it's hitpoints, mana and movement.
#
ADRENALINE

Usage: cast 'adrenaline'

This spell will cause adrenalin to flood your body giving you one extra
attack per EVERY round. It will also make you spend more of your 
movepoints.
#
AGILITY

Usage: cast 'agility' <target>

This spell will increase target's dexterity by three points.
#
ARCANE

Usage: cast 'arcane' 

This powerful spell will reveal you the arcane name for your current 
location. You may later use this name to instantly teleport here with the 
RELOCATE spell.

See also: RELOCATE
#
ARCHERY

Being dwellers of the forest, one of the ranger's first skills is archery.
Being a master in archery will allow you to use your bow and arrows to hit 
your enemy from large distance, doing massive damage. The basic set of bow 
and arrows can be found at Midgaard's weapon shop, but there are lot more 
powerful ones to find.

See also: SHOOT
#
ARCHIRAGE

Archirage is a very powerful skill much like berserk, with one major
difference - it hits *everybody* in the room who is not in your group.
If you are skillful enough you might even hit everyone *TWICE*. You can 
enter archirage only once, at the begining of the fight. Be very careful 
when using it in populated areas.
 
Addenum by Herecy:

NEREALNO I MOCNO. A OPET, ZAMISLI KAD KONAN UPADNE U ARCHIRAGE (TAKO
BIH *JA* TO NAZVAO ). SCENA - NORTH GATE. DIJALOG:
       
   Guard - NEMA OVDE MESTA ZA TAKVE KAO STO SI TI, DECKO!
   Conan - S'A S' REK'O?!
   Guard - AJMO, MAGLA DOK TE NISMO RAZBILI.
       
500h 100m 200v> archirage

          ...

      3 sekunde kasnije:

450h 100m 184v> s
Temple Of Midgaard
... 
#
ARMOR

Usage       : cast 'armor' <target>
Accumulative: Yes

By means of this spell, the wizard creates a magical field of force that 
servers as if it were an extra layer of armor.  This spell does not hinder 
movement, adds no weight or encumbrance. It will lower armor by 15+level/5.

See Also: AC
#
ATONEMENT

Usage: cast 'atonement' 

The spell is of very powerful nature, making your alignment fully justify 
and making you feel great, gaining bonuses to damage in battle.
#
AUTOPSY

Usage: autopsy <corpse>

Ranger can use this skill to find out who made the corpse be.
#
BACKSTAB

Usage: backstab <target>
Stats: DEX              

Backstab is a way to sneak up on a person and attempt to place your dagger
in their back, at exactly the point where it does most damage.  A successful
backstab gives a damage multiplier.

The chance of successfully backstabbing a person depends on how well you
have practiced backstab at your guild, and how agile you are. You will always
succeed when backstabing sleeping persons. You have greater chances of
backstabing opponents that can not see you.

You can use 'abort' command to abort backstab before it happens.


"I say victory is better then honor."
#
BAPTIZE

Usage: cast 'baptize' <target>

Cleric can use this spell to baptize players, changing their alignment to 
the level of his own.
#
BARKSKIN

Usage       : cast 'barkskin' <victim>

This spell hardens the flesh of the caster, making it significantly more
resilient.
#
BASH

Usage: bash [target]
Stats: STR, Weight, Shield weight

Bash is an offensive maneuver where you slam yourself into an opponent in
an attempt to cause damage. Successful bashes may also put the target
temporarily into a compromised position, allowing you to do more damage while
they can not strike back. Since bash involves using the momentum of your own
body, it can be difficult to get back into fighting position, and the
character will be lagged for two rounds after bashing.

Failing to successfully bash a target may result in the basher stumbling
off-balance, and falling to the ground. You may type 'stand' to recover.

"Amazing thing, gravity. It seems to work every time." -Telim'Tor
#
BASHDOOR

Usage: bashdoor <direction>
Stats: STR

This skill will permit a person to use his or her brute strength to smash
open a door. Note that some doors may simply be too strong to be broken.
#
BATTLECRY

Usage: battlecry

If a warrior is selected to lead a party of adventurers, he can issue
forth a battlecry that will inspire his party members and cause them to go
into a rage. The powerful the warrior is, the more he'll inspire his group.

"In the thick of battle, you must keep your wits about you. Yelling a
lot helps, too." -General Jarkeld, the Arctic Fox
#
BEAUTIFY

Usage: cast 'beautify' <victim>

This spell will improve your victim's charisma by 3. Very useful when going 
into the area with many aggressive mobs.
#
BEHEAD

Usage: behead <target>

Behead is skill that will allow skillful and dexterious warrior to instanly 
kill someone, slicing it's head out of the body. The head will remain as a 
trophy to pick up. Success will greatly depend upon level difference 
between you and your target and the difference between your and target's 
dexterity. You can't behead a flying person and other players.

"Inhale. Kill. Exhale."
#
BENEDICTION

Usage: cast 'benediction' <target>

Giving a target a benediction will give the god's approval to their
actions, giving them a significant bonus to hit in battle.

See Also: BLESS, HITROLL
#
BERSERK
                                                                
Usage: berserk
                                                                
Only powerful warriors can master berserking, the ability to enter
insane rage in combat. Its effects are a huge surge of combat prowess,
coupled with a disregard for personal safety. 

When berserk, the warrior gains bonus to his hitroll and damroll,
as well as one extra attack. Berserking warriors are also more resistant
to the effects of magic as they care little for anything except the blood
of their foes.

Once berserk, warrior cannot think of anything else (i.e. flee or rescue),
and may not perform any other skill for four rounds of combat. While berserk,
every swing with a weapon will take three more movement points, and the
warrior will be easier to hit. 

"A true warrior's thoughts are of victory, not death."
#
BLESSING

Usage       : prayfor 'bless' [target | object]

Throughout the ages, priests have been asked to bestow their blessings on
everything from a farmer's prized pig to a young royal couple's marriage.
This blessing works differently depending on whether it is cast on a living
being or an inanimate object.  When cast on a living creature, this spell will
aid in deflecting harmful spells, and improve its ability to score a hit in
combat.  The exact bonuses that this spell provides is largely dependent on
the level of the priest.
Blessing an item will reduce the chances that it will break in the midst of a
fierce battle. If a weapon is blessed, the chance of that weapon making a
critical hit to the opponent will increase. 

"With this marvel, even the weak have a fighting chance!" -- Arcum Dagsson
#
BLINDNESS

Usage       : cast 'blindness' <victim>

Blindness will blind a victim failing its saving throw.
A blinded person will have great trouble hitting their opponent during
combat.
#
BLINK

Usage: cast 'blink' 

This defensive spell will make you constantly blink from one place to 
another making you a very hard target to hit. It will also lower your AC by 
10. During the way you'll blink more often if your dexterity and 
intelligence is higher.
#
BREW

Usage: Brew <drink_container> <'spell'>

This skill will allow you to create potions out of your spells, and share 
them with your friends (or sell them?). In order to brew a spell into a 
potion you must have some kind of a drink conatainer (bottle will do for 
example) and must be at least five levels above the level you got that 
spell. You can brew any of the following spells:

Cure light         Detect poison
Cure blind         Detect alignment
Cure drunk         Detect invisible
Prot cold          Bless
Prot fire          Remove poison
Prot lightning     Quench
Detect magic       Sanctuary

See also: SCRIBE
#
"CHARGE SPELL" "SPELL CHARGE"

Usage: cast 'charge' <victim>

This powerful spell will turn half of caster's mana points into a charging
ray that will do up to three times more damage then the mana points spent.
Since this spell uses pure mana energy, damage done will be exactly the 
one
specified, no matter if the victim is under SANCTUARY or any other affect.
Due to it's nature, the spell can not actually kill a victim, but 
almost...

see also: CHARGE SKILL
#
CIRCLE "CIRCLE BACKSTAB"

Usage: circle [target]
Stats: DEX
      
Circle is a skill learned by advanced thieves. This skill allows the 
practicer to slip out of sight of his opponent briefly, and launch a
surprise attack upon him from behind. 

Circle allows you to perform a half strength backstab while you are engaged
in combat. If target is fighting someone else, it will switch to you following
the circle attack. Circle carries a two round battle lag following its usage.

See also: BACKSTAB
#
CLAIRVOYANCE

Usage: cast 'clairvoyance' <victim>

This spell will allow you to see where your victim is placed.

#
CLONE

Usage       : cast 'clone'

This spell creates a mob that is an exact clone of the caster. You shall not
have any mob followers before you attempt to clone yourself. Your clone will
have the same abbilities as you do, and you will be able to order it to cast
spells.
One of the most powerful spells in the Lands.

Other spells to note: ANIMATE DEAD, CONJURE ELEMENTAL, GATE
#
COMBO

After years of training in elbow swing, knee thrust and sweepkick, you 
might use this special kick which is the combination of the those three.
It can be extremly lethal to your opponent.
#
CONCENTRATE

As monks become more proficient in their ability to master their minds
and their bodies, they slowly learn to focus their excess energy to heal 
themselves. Monk will concentrate to transfer all of his mana to hitpoints.
#
CONSIDER

Usage : consider <monster>

This command will compare you to the monster. There is also a consider 
skill that will produce more information then usual consider:

> consider peacekeeper
LEVEL        : Way out better
HEALTH       : Vastly superior
BATTLE POWER : Slightly better
------------------------------
You ARE mad! 
#
COOK

Syntax: fillet <corpse>, cook <fillet>

Fillet will produce raw fillet from the just made corpse. Cook will serve 
you to remove any poison from the food (since it might be raw).

#
COUNTERSTRIKE

Usage: automatic

A counterstrike is performed after a successful parry, where the defender 
parries an attack and counterattacks, striking the attacker. A somewhat 
difficult action to perform, it takes years of experience, incredible 
dexterity, and the shrewedness to read an attacker's movements and counter 
them accordingly.
#
CURSE

Usage       : cast 'curse' (victim | object)
Accumulative: No

An unseen globe of disfavor follows the victim.  In battle things just
don't go for them, and they find it much harder to land blows and such.  
Curse cast on a person that fails the saving throw, will reduce the
hitroll by level/8, and reduce the saving throw versus spell by level/6.
Curse cast on items has various affects. 

See Also: -
#
DARKENING

Usage: cast 'darkening' <target>

This spell will reduce target's combat senses furthermore reducing damage
done by target's weapons.
#
DISARM

Usage: disarm [target]

Disarm is a somewhat showy and unreliable skill, designed to relieve your
opponent of his weapon. The best possible chance of disarming occurs when
you are skilled both your own and your opponent's weapon. Only talented
thieves and warriors may learn this skill. 
#
DISINTIGRATE

Usage       : cast 'disintigrate' <victim | object>

This spell causes a person to instantly disintigrate or causes large amounts 
of damage - (level*3)d4.
#
DIVINITY

Usage: cast 'divinity' <target>

This powerful spell bathes the target in a divine light, embuing them, for 
a time, with great power granted by the gods. The light provides the target
with great regeneration and major resistance to magical attacks.  
Furthermore, the divine powers grant the target increases protection from 
blows, as well as increasing the accuracy of the target's aim and ability 
to do damage.


#
DODGE

Usage: automatic
Stats: DEX

In the words of one wise warrior, 'the best way to block a blow is to
not be where it lands'. The dodge skill honors this tradition, by improving
the character's natural agility to the point where many blows will miss the
target. The chance of dodging is also affected by the dexterity of the
attacker and the target.


See Also: PARRY
#
DOMINATION

Usage: cast 'domination' 

Using this spell, high level cleric may bring peace to his current location 
by dominating the minds of the other creatures. It stops fights of all 
creatures weaker (level) then you. It will also clear their memory, causing 
them to forget players that attacked them. This spell greatly depends upon 
your charisma.
#
EARTHQUAKE

Usage       : cast 'earthquake'

Upon uttering this spell the caster calls upon his deity to shake the 
very ground they stand on in order to destroy their foes. This spell will 
damage everybody in the room, except the caster's group,  by levelD2+level
hitpoints of damage.

See Also: -
#
ENDURANCE

Usage: cast 'endurance' 

Endurance is a unique spell developed by rangers. When under the influence
of this spell, terrain movement cost is halved when traveling. Also, the
ranger will be able to endure the combat longer as his swings will take less
vitality then usual.
#
ENLIGHTMENT

Usage: cast 'enlightment' <target>

This spell will improve target's combat senses furthermore improving damage
done by target's weapons.
#
EQUINOX

Usage: cast 'equinox' 

This is the most powerful spell existant to a spell-caster. One note: Do 
NOT be wearing anything on your head while casting this spell, specially 
not any metal equipment! Upon casting equinox you will try to call upon the 
forces of the Universe to stand behind you, giving all your offensive 
spells VERY LARGE bonus to damage. Upon successful cast of equinox you will 
be also fully restored and also, all of your spells will need only SMALL 
amount of mana for each cast. 
Drawbacks: This special condition will make your body extremly vulnerable. 
Every cast you make will damage yourself, and all the other damage you 
receive will be larger then normal.
Normal chance for this spell to succeed is 50%. The damaging power of 
DISINITGRATE spell is not affected by EQUINOX (however the mana cost is
halved).
If this spell fails, you... Hmmm, hummm... It better not fail.
#
ESCAPE

Usage: automatic

Allows you to get out of combat without panic. If you make the roll,
you will escape the fight and safely leave the room. You won't throw
your weapon away and you will lose only half the normal exp for fleeing.
Unlike FLEE, the chances of failing an ESCAPE are very low.


"He who fights and runs away, lives to fight another day."
#
FAME

Syntax: fame <target>

Using this skill, you may gather mobs to join you after you tell them about 
your legendary travels. The skill uses some movement points, and is more 
likely to succeed as the level difference between you and the target mob 
grows.

"Join the army, see foreign countries!" they'd said.
#
FEEBLEMIND

Usage: cast 'feeblemind' <victim>

This spell causes the victim to become a moron if they fail their save.
It is terribly powerful spell and therefore last only for one hour.
#
FEINT

Usage: automatic

Feint is a Warrior skill which improves your chances for hitting your
enemy.  Feint is automatic, and can fool your victim into thinking your
blow will land somewhere else. It basically give you an extra chance to land
a hit with an attack that would otherwise miss.
#
FILLET

Usage : fillet <object>

If you're ever hungry, then this skill is for you.  It can only be used on
a corpse, but it'll let you cut a slice of flesh off.  Use in conjunction 
with cook for those times when you're out of food, out of money, or just
feel like devolving.

See Also: COOK
#
FIREBALL

Usage       : cast 'fireball' <victim>

This spell is the one of the most powerful offensive spells a mage can 
cast. It will do levelD7 of damage. Beware that both wet 
conditions (such as even a rain) and protection from fire will seriously 
lower the damage of this spell.

See also: EXTINGUISH
#
FIRESTORM

Usage       : cast 'firestorm'


By this spell the caster calls into being an enormous cloud of flame
which whirls around the room, searing those not in the caster's group.
The intense heat does (level/2)*(2d7)+level hitpoints of damage to 
everything in the room leaving it either roasted or burning to death. Wet 
conditions as well fire protection will significantly lower the damage this 
spell does.

See also: EXTINGUISH
#
FLAMESTRIKE

Usage: cast 'flamestrike' 

Upon casting this spell you will conjure a flaming pillar damaging 
everything in the room for 10d10+2*level hitpoints of damage.
#
FORAGE

A good ranger and druid can eat almost anything.  The best ones, however, 
can usually find something a little better to eat after looking for a 
while. You can forage for food, but this only works outside of cities, and 
outdoors.
#
GUINNESS GUINESS

Usage       : cast 'guinness' <victim>
 
   This spell will turn the victim's blood to good EXTRA STOUT.
This is a little bit uncomfortable for the victim and he/she/it
will significantly have a hard hour.  During this hour, the victim's
attack and defense rolls will have suffer 4 point penalties.
   After one hour... the spell will leave the victim drunk for
about another twenty-three hours.
#
GUT

Usage: gut [target]

When your opponent is below 10% of their hit points you may use gut skill 
to slash their stomach open, and spill their intestines out. They will 
immediately fall to the ground stunned, their life depending upon your 
mercy.
As you get better with the skill you will be able to gut your opponents
even earlier.

"First blood isn't as important as last blood."
#
HAGGLE
      
Usage: automatic
      
Haggling is an indispensable skill to the trader. It allows a character
to match wits with a merchant, seeking to get a better price for
merchandise, or to buy at the lowest possible cost. Unfortunately,
most merchants are already very skilled at haggling, so the untrainined
adventurer had best guard his treasure closely.

"Bargaining with a goblin is like trading with a child; both believe
they already own everything."
#
HAMMERING

Syntax: hammer <object>

Person trained in this skill might use it to better some armor. However 
there is always a chance of completly breaking it.
#
HARM

Usage       : cast 'harm' <victim>

This is a very powerful cleric spell. If your victim has less then 8 times
your level hitpoints, harm will leave it only 1d4 hitpoints remaining. Else, it
will cause levelD4+level points of damage. 

See Also: -
#
HASTE

Usage        : cast 'haste' <victim>
 
This spell will make the victim move much quicker then usual. That means
you'll be needing less movement points to traverse a terrain then usaul. 
In battle it means that you will one more additional attacks but 
you'll loose one more movement points for every hit you make. 
#
HIDE

Usage: hide

When you type hide there is a chance that you hide in the room. If hidden
you can only be "sensed" by some spells. Even if sensed your identity will
remain hidden. Of course, you can see and be seen by other people hiding
in the same location as you are; you can be sensed only by people that are
at least your level or higher; lower level characters simply won't be able
to detect you.

Hide is broken by pressing enter, regardless of whether you typed a command
or not.

"You are not prey until a predator knows of your existence."
#
HUNT

Usage:            hunt <victim name>
or to stop:       hunt !

Having mastered the skill of tracking, ranger can learn hunting. This skill 
will make you automaticly track and move. 
This skill is dependant on the TRACK skill. The more it is learned the 
lower is the chance you'll get a false trail.
#
IDENTIFY

Usage       : cast 'identify' <target>

These two spells can be used to identify many different items, giving their 
statistics and effects. 
#
INFRAVISION

Usage       : cast 'infravision' <victim>

The target of this spell has his or her eyes magically enhanced to see
not only the color spectrum, but also the infrared spectrum.  This are
waves given off from heat.
#
INTELLIGIZE

Usage: cast 'intelligize' <target>

This spell, one of the powerful of the druid, will make target's 
intelligence rise to it's maximum, give a 50 mana bonus and 5 hitroll.
#
INTESIFY

Usage: cast 'intesify' 

Upon casting this spell mage will go in a special coma-like state, able to 
better focus his internal energies. It will result in great increase to 
power of his spells, specially destructive ones.
#
INVISIBILITY

Usage       : cast 'invisibility' <victim | object>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 24 hours, permanent on objects.

This type of invisibility is passive.  Light is actually 'bent' around
the target.  When you 'see', you are actually viewing rebounding light,
so those that see this way, see nothing.
Attacking while invisible will immediately break the spell.

#
KATA

After performing a kata, monk will improve his chances to hit during a
combat. Each kata will cost you 40 movement points. If you are at your
regular alignment, you will gain additional bonus.
#
KICK

Usage: kick [target]
Stats: STR

The success of a kick depends upon how well you are learned. The damage
depends upon your damroll and strength. Also if you are wearing boots that
are of type weapon, the damage is increased. 
#
KNOCKOUT

Usage: knockout <target>

This very useful skill will allow you to stun your opponent, before attack.
#                                                                
"POWER KICK"

Usage: kick [target]

This is improved version of kick skill. The main difference is it hits
as much as three times harder then kick and may send your opponent sprawling
to the ground. If performed well it may even send your opponent sprawling
into the next room!
#
LEADERSHIP

Usage: automatic

Skilled warriors are great and trusted leaders. Inspired by your 
charisma and skill, group under your command will gain more experience 
when exploring the world and fighting the monsters.
#
LISTEN

Usage: listen [direction]

This skill will allow a thief to strain and listen carefuly to his 
surroundings. He will be able to sense invisible and hidden characters by 
the noises they make.

Without arguments you will scan your current location, or you can give it a 
direction argument (eg. 'listen north'). A skillful thief might even listen 
behind closed doors.
#
LUNGE

Usage: automatic

When fighting more then one enemy, a skilled warrior is able to hit more 
than one foe in a round of combat. Lunge skill is automatic, and will 
allow you to occasionaly lunge at your enemies, performing one or two 
attacks on them, and then returning to person or monster you are fighting.
#
MATERIALIZE

Usage: cast 'materialize' <obj>

This is a MULTI spell.
This is extremly powerful spell. It will allow the casters to summon almost
any object to their present location. Though, the spell can not be used to
summon magical items, or items worn by other creatures.


See also: MULTI
#
"!FIRST AID"

Usage: aid <target>

Being one of the first methods ranger learns to heal himself and his 
group, first aid skill is widely used. First aid is only applied if target's
vitality is below quarter maximum, and this skill will restore it to quarter
of maximum. Target will have to stay calm for two rounds and won't be able
to enter any commands.
#
MEDIC

The ranger may apply his woodsman knowledge in medicine to aid him or 
herself as well as the others. Medic is similar to the first aid skill, only
it will instantly restore target's vitality to half the maximum. Target will
have to stay calm for two rounds and won't be able to enter any commands.
#
MEDITATION MEDITATE

This special monk skill will allow you to sink into a deep trans, completly
relaxing for one hour. During this time you'll regenerate faster then your
usual rate, dependig how much you know the skill.
#
MELEE

Melee, literally a fight between several people, is a skill brought to a
new dimension by skillful warriors. They are able to engage more then one 
foe simultaneously, moving quickly and furiously to damage each one during 
that round, and also knock them to the ground. This skill is mostly 
dependant upon warrior's strength.
#
NAP

Usage: cast 'nap' 

This spell will put your group to nap. You will be regenerating at much 
faster rate then usual, for the amount of time the spell lasts. However you 
won't be able to wake and stand unless someone attacks you.
#
"ALFA NERVE"

Syntax: alfa <target> | self

This skill, known only to monks, allows them to use their knowledge of 
anathomy to control the flow of target's vitality. It's most commonly
used for healing purposes. The skill will also drain some of the monk's
own vitality due to huge amount of concentration needed.
#
PARRY

Parry is an automatically triggered defensive skill. This skill allows
the combatant to block the attack of an opponent. A successful parry will
counteract any damage that would have normally been dealt to the 
combatant. Success of parry depends upon your knowledge in the weapons
used by both you and your enemy.

See also: DODGE
#
PEEK

Usage: automatic

This skill allows you to peek into a victim's inventory and see what they
are carrying.  To use the skill you look at the victim and if successful
you will see their inventory. The better is this skill practiced, the more 
items you will be able to see. You will also learn the wealth of your victim,
to see whether they are suitable target for pickpocketing. 
It is a required skill for any player who plans to steal for a living.
#
PETRIFY

Usage: cast 'petrify' <victim>

This is a MULTI spell.
This spell will petrify your victim. While petrified the victim can only 
move it's eyes. Meaning, it can not walk around. Meaning, it can't fight 
back. Duration of this spell is one hour, with a 50% chance the spell will
wear off during that hour.
The victim can be placed anywhere in the world.

See also: MULTI
#
PLAGUE

Usage: cast 'plague' <victim>

This potent spell makes target sick of plague and damages them each
tick.  It spreads from one character in a room to others, having
the same effect on them as the original victim, so beware!

#
CONCEAL

Usage: conceal (toggles on/off)

This skills covers swift actions performed by a thief, like GETTING
or DROPING items without anyone noticing. You may toggle this with
'conceal' command. 

It also allows you to put an object into someone's inventory without
them knowing, using 'plant' command.
#
"POISON SPELL"

Usage       : cast 'poison' <victim | food | drink>
Accumulative: Yes on persons.
Duration    : permanent on food and drinks.

Casting poison on food or drink (containers) will poison it.
Eating poisoned food/drinks will poison the person eating or
drinking.

A person who is poisoned will suffer 10-50 points of damage every
tick, and gain less points than usual. It will also have it's strength 
reduced by two.

See Also: "detect poison" or "cure poison"
#
PORTAL

Usage: cast 'portal' <victim>

This spell will open a transcendental portal between you and the victim,
which you and others can use to instantly teleport to the victim's zone.
You can 'enter' the portal at both sides, but beware the the portal will
close after some time.

See also: DIMENSION WALK, SUMMON
#
QUENCH "QUENCH THIRST"

Usage       : prayfor 'quench' [target]

This spell will instantly quench target's thirst.

"... nor shall they lack the water to live."
#
SATE "SATE HUNGER"

Usage       : prayfor 'sate' [target]

When supplies are low, a cleric can through the casting of this spell fill
the bellies of the hungry with enough vitamins and nutrition to last for a
day or two.  However halflings, due to their extreme love for food,
refuse this form of sustenance, as it has no flavor to assuage their
voracious appetites.

"Those who follow me shall not be hungry..."
#
RAGNAROK

Usage: cast 'ragnarok'

This is a MULTI spell.
And also, one of the most powerful spells known. To cut the long story 
short, this spell will damage EVERY creature in the caster's zone for 
7*(total_group_level) hitpoints of damage, with no upper limit.

See also: MULTI
#
RECHARGE

Usage: cast 'recharge' <obj>

Using this spell you can recharge staffs and wands and make them good as 
new. However if you overcharge it, it may explode.
#
REGENERATE

Usage: cast 'regenerate' <victim>

This spell will make victim's body cells regenerate much faster no matter
if the victim is standing, fighting or sleeping. Higher the constitution the
victim has, higher the regeneration rate is.
#
RELOCATE

Usage: cast 'relcoate' <arcane_name>

This spell will instantly portal you to the location that suits given 
arcane name. There is a possibility the spell will fail, in which case 
you'll end randomly somewhere.

See also: ARCANE
#
RESCUE

Usage: rescue <target>

This skill is the ability to throw one's body between the target and one of
the target's attackers, so as to make the attacker switch targets to the
rescuer instead.  Only one attacker per combat round may be attracted in
this way. You can only 'turn' one monster for each rescue attempt. This is
highly useful when playing in groups.

"The heart's courage is the soul's guardian."
#
RESSURECTION

Usage: cast 'ressurection'  <victim>

This is a MULTI spell.
This spell will restore victim's movement and mana points to maximum, and 
heal for 10*(total_group_level) of hitpoints. The victim can be placed 
anywhere in the world.

See also: MULTI
#
RESTORATION

Usage: cast 'restoration' 

Complete heal! It is a culmination of all the cleric's healing spells.
#
RETRANSPORT

Usage: cast 'retransport' <object>

This spell will retransport an item stored in the druid's holy place to you.

See also: TRANSPORT
#
SANCTUARY

Usage       : cast 'sanctuary' <victim>
Accumulative: No

This spell summons a glowing force of protection around the subject of the 
spell.  This force will make all attacks on the person protected only do 
half damage.

See Also: -
#
SCARE

Usage: scare <target>

The skill is used by thieves to intimidate their opponets and make them 
flee. You can try this even in a battle, which may give you an extra 
oppurtunity to backstab your opponent once more if they flee.
#
SCRIBE

Usage: Scribe <paper> <'spell'>

This skill will allow you to create scrolls out of your spells, and share 
them with your friends (or sell them?). In order to scribe a spell into a 
scroll you must have some kind of a paper (some other scroll will do for 
example) and must be at least five levels above the level you got the 
spell you wish to scribe. You can scribe any of the following spells:

Magic missile        Identify
Blindness            Sleep
Curse                Weaken
Detect alignment     Teleport
Detect magic         Gust of wind
Detect invisible
Fireball            


See also: BREW
#
SHAMROCK

Usage: cast 'shamrock' <target>

This spell will improve target's luck. After that target will have a 
smaller chance to fail when casting a spell.
#
SHARPEN

Syntax: sharpen <arrow>

Using this skill, you might sharpen an arrow improving it's stats (damage
and maximum distance). The higher your level is, the bigger improvement 
you'll make. You can sharpen the arrow as many times as you wish but if you
fail during sharpen, you might break or destroy the arrow.
#
SHILLELAGH

Usage: cast 'shillelagh' <target>

Being a cheerful creatures, druids use this spell to make them feel even 
better, improving their regeneration rate.
This spell can also be cast upon others.
#
"SIXTH SENSE"

Usage: automatic

After years of living in every day's dangers, seasoned warriors develop a 
special feeling, often called the 'sixth sense'. This special feeling 
guides warriors out of dangerous situations, saving their life many times.
In game terms, sixth sense will allow you to spot and avoid dangerous 
and deadly traps. Further, in combat, it will greatly lower the chances
of your opponent criticaly damaging you. Furthermore, if you get ambushed
or attacked, you will be able to react first, and hit back before their 
strike, gaining significant advantage in combat.
#
SLEEP

Usage       : cast 'sleep' <person>

If failing saving throw versus spell, the person will fall asleep.
A person who is affected by sleep can only be awakened if attacked or when 
the spell fades away. Attack on sleeping person will do much more damage 
then usual. Sleeping persons can be easy target for a backstab or steal.

#
SLOW

Usage       : cast 'slow' <victim>

This spell drapes a heavy blanket on the victims mind.  The affect is
said to feel like your limbs are having to move through water, and that
everything you do seems in slow motion. It will result in a loss of 
attacks.
#
SNEAK

Usage: sneak (toggles on/off)

You toggle this skill off or on.  When on, you use up twice as much movement
points, but no one will notice you enter or leave a room if you succeed.
This can help you get past aggresive monsters or unfriendly players.
#
STALK

Usage: follow <target>

Stalk allows you to follow someone completely unnoticed. No message is 
given to your victim that you are following them. It is best combined
with MOVE HIDDEN. 
#
STONESKIN

Usage       : cast 'stoneskin'

This makes the skin of the caster change into a stone-like material.  This 
will greatly improve the armor class and make the caster much more 
resistant to piercing attacks (daggers, pikes and such).  This is a 
personal spell, it cannot be cast on others.

Other spells of note:  ARMOR, BARKSKIN
#
STRENGTH

Usage       : cast 'strength' <victim>
Accumulative: duration

The victim will gain 1 strength point and another one if caster's level 
more or equals 32.

See Also: GIANT STRENGTH
#
STUN

Usage: stun <target>
Stats: DEX

Skillful thief can sneak up and STUN their victim, paralyzing them. Victim
will remain stunned for couple of seconds. Enough for BACKSTAB...
When stunned, victim will receive 180% normal damage. Chances to stun
a victim who is under the affect of HASTE or ADRENALINE are lower.
#
SUMMON

Usage       : prayfor 'summon' <target>


If the need arises to bring someone into the room where you stand, it is
required that you speak their name while calling for this prayer, and if
they are of an equal or lower level than you that person will appear
instantly. However be warned that summoning aggressive mobs into the town
or low-level areas is a crime and the guilty will be punished.

If you attempt to summon a monster, it will get a saving throw, and you
may wind up with the wrong monster.  You cannot summon from NO MAGIC rooms.
You cannot summon to TUNNEL or PRIVATE rooms, nor from PEACEFUL rooms.
You cannot summon someone who is fighting, as it is  impossible to get a
precise fix of their location.
#
SUNRAY

Usage: cast 'sunray' 

By means of this spell, the caster causes an intense beam of light spread 
from his hands.  The intensity of the light is such that it might blind (as 
per spell) all the creatures in the room that are not grouped with the 
caster.
#
SURCEASE

Usage: cast 'surcease'

Surcease is the higher of the ranger's spells.  It provides a large
amount of healing to the ranger and their comrades after the heat of
battle is over.
#
SWEEPKICK

When praacticed enough, you can use this skill to sweep the floor below 
your opponent doing large amounts of damage and smashing him to the ground.
This skill is highly dependant upon your dexterity.
#
SWITCH

Allows you to switch opponents.  If you are attacking X and want to attack Y,
type 'kill Y'.  It will check against your SWITCH skill, and if you make it,
you stop attacking X, and attack Y...
#
SYNOST

Usage: cast 'synost' <victim>

Synost is a powerful spell that will allow you send your mana through the 
synost eter, converting it into target's hitpoints. Your target can be 
anywhere in the world, as the eter itself will find it. Every time you cast 
it you'll loose 1/5-th of your mana. During the transfer some of it 
will be lost. 
#
TELEPORT

Usage       : cast 'teleport' [self]

Teleport will instantly transfer you to another location in the world. This 
location is random, and thus there will always be a risk of landing in a 
fatal location (but not in a death trap).

See Also: LOCAL TELEPORT, SUMMON, RELOCATE, DIMENSION WALK, PORTAL
#
TORNADO

Usage: cast 'tornado'

Upon casting this spell, druid will try to conjure a tornado that will 
attack all the creatures in the room doing 2dlevel of damage. More 
important is that the tornado will blow away some creatures (depending on 
their weight) out of the room.
#
TRACK

Usage: track <target>

This skill allows the character to find the path to the target creature
they are tracking. If you didn't learn it well enough, you might get the
wrong route.
#
TRANSPORT

Usage: cast 'transport' <object>

Druid can use this spells to transport an item to the druid's holy place, 
well hidden to other beings. Those items can then be retransfered with the 
RETRANSPORT spell. All the items are being stored to one location.
#
TRIP

Usage: trip [target]
Stats: DEX

Trip is a skill used by thieves to take an opponent off his/her feet.  Once
on the ground, the target is unable to attack, has a reduced ability to
defend and will take additional damage from attacks.  A tripped character
will also be lagged for a short period of time, and be unable to cast spells.
#
VENTRILOQUATE

Usage       : cast 'ventriloquate' <victim | object> <text>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

For all people in the same room as the caster that fail a saving
throw, the spell will make the object or victim appear to say the
text written. People saving will only notice that someone tired
to make it sound that way, not who.

Example:

> cast 'vent' mayor I've got 921,923 coins, don't even consider killing me.

See Also: -
#
VISITATION

Usage: cast 'visitation' <victim>

This rather specific spell will allow you to "visit" your victim for a 
certain amount of time, after which the portal appears and transfers you 
back to the original location.

See also: RELOCATE
#
VITALITY

Usage: cast 'vitality' 

This spell will grant a cleric one sixth of his max hitpoints of extra life 
energy, for the duration of few hours.
#
WATERWALK

Usage: cast 'waterwalk'

No comment :)
This spell is similar to LEVITATE spell and yet different to the FLY spell.
#
WEAKEN

Usage       : cast 'weaken' <victim>
Accumulative: duration

This spell makes the victim weaker by two strength points. Casting this 
spell generally irritates the victim.
 
#
WEB

Usage: cast 'web' <victim>

Web creates a sticky mass which covers the victim eliminating their
ability to easily leave the room, flee and to dodge attacks. It will 
also lower the victim's dexterity by two. Given time the victim will be 
able to break out of the web.
You can use the 'struggle' command once you find yourself in the web.
#
WHIRLWIND

If you are wielding two weapons, this will cause you to spin rapidly, 
hitting everything in the room. However, there is a chance you'll loose 
your balance and fall to the ground, being an easy target to hit.
#
WRAITHFORM

Usage: cast 'wraithform'

This potent spell will turn caster translucent allowing him to pass through 
doors for example.
#
GRIP
    
Usage: automatic    
Stats: DEX

This skill is automatic, once practiced.  The skill causes you to grip
your weapon tightly as someone tries to disarm you, making it far more
difficult to successfully disarm you. Furthermore, when fleeing, the
chances you will throw your weapon in panic will greatly decrease. It also
affects your ability to read scrolls and quaff potions in the heat of battle,
making you more likely to succeed.   

"Never doubt a man who never lets go of his sword."
#
"SHIELD MASTERY"

Usage: autoamtic

Seasoned warriors may learn this skills and truly become the masters in 
using their shield in combat. Once practiced, this skill is automatic
and will greatly increase your chance of blocking incoming attacks with
your shield. It will also make you more likely to successfully BASH someone
with your shield.
#
"DODGE MASTERY"
        
Usage: automatic
            
Although very skillful in backstabing their opponents, thief has to be ready
to engage in combat when neccessary. While not good in hitting their opponent
as warriors are, they are unmatched masters in dodging blows. 
This skill is automatic and will greatly increase your dodging in combat.

"The best defense is to not get hit."
#
"SPOT TRAPS"

Usage: automatic                       
Stats: INT, DEX

This skill will allow you to spot the trap before it activates. Due to many
tricks in setting the trap, you will not be able to spot all traps but only
those set by at most equal level thief.

This skill will also allow you to spot a death trap before you enter the
deadly room and will stop you in place.

See also: DISABLE
#
EAVESDROP

Usage: eavesdrop <direction>
       eavesdrop here
Stop:  eavesdrop

Thieves, being the masters of gaining useful information, have the unique 
ability to always hear what they need to. This skill allows the thief to
listen everything that is happening in the specified location even
if the player is miles away.
#
DIRTKICK "DIRT KICK"

Usage: dirt [target]
Stats: DEX

Consider by some to be a cowardly skill, dirt kicking gives the clever
combatant a chance to blind his opponent by casting dirt into his eyes.
The blindness does not last long, usually only one combat round, but can
provide an edge in combat as blinded opponent it easier to hit and will
have trouble hitting back. Dexterity helps in hitting or avoiding a
dirt kick.
#
DUCK      

Usage: automatic
Stats: DEX, Height

An automatic skill based on your size and the size of the person you are
fighting. The shorter and more dexterous you are in comparison to the
person you are fighting the more likely you are to duck under the attack.
#
"BLIND FIGHTING"

Usage: automatic

This skill reduces the penalty to hit when fighting in unlit areas or when
blinded. This skill is automatic once learned.  
#
ASSASSINATE 

Usage: automatic

This skill is automaticaly checked once practiced. If successful, it will
add extra damage to all your backstabs making them truly lethal.
#
TAUNT       

Usage: taunt <target>

This skill can be used to taunt the target, possibly sending it into a
berserker rage, attacking everything they see. This skill can not be used
on players characters.
#
"DART TRAP"

Usage: trap dart

This basic trap contains of a small dart that shoots at the first person
entering the room be it a mob or a player. It deals around 30-70 points of
damage.
#
"ROPE TRAP"

Usage: trap rope

While not really a trap (just a rope hidden in a convenient place) it can be
very effective. It will cause the victim to trip over and fall down. Useful
if you want to slow down the persuit or suddenly attack your victim (remember
you get bonus to damage when they are on the ground).

See also: TRAPS

"The feet have no eyes."
#                                                                            
"HORROR TRAP"

Usage: trap horror

This trap contains of a frightening doll, and may cause your victim to flee
when trigerred. Unlike other traps, this one is not trigger-and-die, but will
remain effective in the location for some time.
#                                                                            
"FIRE TRAP"

Usage: trap fire

This magical trap will release a small fireball onto the target.
#                                                                            
"LOCAL TELEPORT TRAP"

Usage: trap local teleport

This magical trap will teleport your victim to a random location in the zone,
should they fail their saving throw vs spell.
#                                                                            
"BLIND TRAP"

Usage: trap blind

This trap activates a flash of bright light when it is triggered. It may
blind your victim for quite a long period of time.
#                                                                            
"STUN TRAP"

Usage: trap stun

This trap may be used to stun your opponents.
#                                                                            
"ACID TRAP"

Usage: trap acid

This trap throws a bucket of acid onto the unfortunate victim.
It's not hard t imagine the effects.
#                                                                            
"WEB TRAP"

Usage: trap web

This trap will cover the victim in sticky web that will lower their
dexterity and make them really hard to move, flee or fight. They
might try to tear the web with 'struggle' command.
#                                                                            
"SLEEP TRAP"

Usage: trap sleep

help is under construction.
#                                                                            
"TELEPORT TRAP"

Usage: trap teleport

This magical trap will teleport victim into random location in mud,
should they fail they saving throw vs spell.
#
"GAS TRAP"

Usage: trap gas

This trap releases poisonous gas that will make the victim suffer both 
the affects of poisoning and choking. Very dangerous.                    
#
"CALTROPS TRAP"

Usage: trap caltrops

This trap injures a victim's legs with sharp spikes. It inflicts loss of
dexterity and movement, as well as some injury.
#
"DOOM TRAP"

Usage: trap teleport

This little baby is a real doom device. It combines effects of caltrops,
gas and acid trap as well as tremendous damage. Extremly deadly to your
victim.                       
#                                              
"POISONOUS DART TRAP"

Usage: trap poison

This is advanced version of a dart trap. It deals around 50-80 points of
damage, but more important, it will poison your victim
#  
"KNIFE THROWING" "THROW DAGGERS" 

Being their primary weapon of choice, thieves quickly become very adept in
handling daggers. This skill will allow you to aim more accuratly and deal
increased damage when throwing daggers at someone.  

Note that throwing things at other characters is considered an offensive act.
The probability of hitting your target is related to the size of the target,
and dexterities of thrower and target.

While fighting, you may throw things at whatever you are attacking without
specifying a target. It's best to throw daggers this way but you may
throw anything you want. See QUICKTHROW. Notice that you don't have to specify
object to throw, you will simply use the first found dagger in your inventory
instead.

See also: THROW QUICKTHROW
#
DISTRACT
      
Usage: automatic
               
This skills allows you to distract your opponent, making them loose one
attack in the next round of combat. This skills is automatic when practiced,
and can be very effective once mastered.
#   
ENVENOM

Usage: envenom <weapon|food|drinkcon> <poison>

This skill allows the thief to poison either slash or pierce weapons, food and
drinks.
The poison on the blade will last for one successful hit before its potency
is destroyed, and it will have to be envenomed again. The initial wound with
the poisoned weapon will cause more damage depending upon the knowledge in
in this skill. When poisoned, the victim will suffer poison damage and
it's regeneration will be significantly decreased.

For more info on poison see help on POISON.

If you do not specify the <poison> parameter, default poison will be used.

There are several advanced types of poison known to thieves

LEVEL	POISON	     NEEDED	                EXTRA EFFECT
-----   ------       ------                     ------------
16      default      an amber stone             none
21	slowdeath    poisonous ivy	        double initial damage
26      quickdeath   a corpse of a red spider   triple initial damage
31      mourner      shard of glass             str -2, con -2, dex -2
36	agonizer     yellow mushroom	        str -3, con -3, dex -3
41      petrifier    a black lotus		victim paralyzed for 3 rounds
46      widowmaker   shell of a black widow     noone survived to tell

See also: POISON
#
"DUAL CIRCLE"
   
Usage: circle
Stats: DEX
   
This skill allows you to perform circle backstabs with both of your daggers.
#
DISGUISE
                                                                            
This very powerful skill allows you two things:                                                                            

1. It is checked when you enter a room with the creature that may
remember your character from a previous combat. A succesful disguise
roll will keep the creature from remembering (and attacking) you.
However, remaining in the room with the creature will eventually
cause it to remember.    

2. By typing 'disguise <text>' you may disguise yourself to whatever
you wish!

Example 1: disguise A huge dragon is is standing here.
Example 2: disguise A strawberry bush grows in the corner.

When a player look at the room he or she gets your disguised description,
but only if your disguise skill exceeds four times their INT.
#
AMBUSH

Usage: ambush [target]
Stats: DEX

Ambush is ranger or thieve's ability to hide somewhere, and instantly attack
the intended victim as soon as the victim arrives. If you succeed you will
deal extra damage to the surprised victim. Victim will be also stunned for
one combat round. Best used in conjunction with traps and move hidden skill.

> ambush
You will ambush first person to enter.

> ambush troll
You will ambush anyone matching 'troll'.
#
"DANCE OF DAGGERS"

Usage: daggerdance
Stats: DEX

This is one of the assassin's finest and deadliest skills.
Dance of daggers is performed with two wielded daggers. Assassin starts
spinning in a deadly dance, hitting everyone in the room. When someone
is hit, skill check is then made (skill with daggers) and if successful,
another hit will follow. This is repeated until assassin either tires
or fails his skill check. If performed by a master, it can deal out
tremendous amounts of damage. 

"Knives in the sky, cries in the air, and blood on the ground."
#
CUTTHROAT "CUT THROAT"

Usage: cutthroat <victim>
Stats: DEX

This deadly attack will perform automatic kill of monster 10 levels below you.
If it doesn't, cutthroat will severaly cripple the defenses of any victim.
It can only be used as the first attack in a combat sequence. Following a
cutthroat attack, regardless whether it succeeds or not, the victim cannot
execute any further commands until two rounds of combat have been completed.
Furthermore, they will be choking and constantly losing hitpoints until the
regain their breath.
#
TUMBLE                  

Usage: tumble <toggles on/off>
Stats: DEX                                     
                                     
Thieves, after many years of dodging blows of their opponents, become
so adept, they are able to learn the more advanced skill of tumble. 
When this skill is used in combat, the character becomes harder to hit
by all attackers and chances to avoid being hit with the dodge skill
are greatly increased.  However when tumble is toggled on, thief will
be one round slower when using circle backstab.
#
REFRESH

Usage: cast 'refresh' <victim>

This spell will cure blindness and as well sate victim's hunger and quench
it's thirst, cure drunkness and restore movement.
#
"GROUND CONTROL"

Usage: automatic
Stats: DEX

This automatic skill comes in handy when warrior is forced to fight from
the ground level. It will not only reduce any combat penalties for such
unfortunate position, but will actually increase defense bonus (as warrior
will fully concentrate on defense until he or she stands up).
#
"COMBAT JUMP"

Usage: automatic
Stats: DEX

This combat move is simple but effective one. When opponent swings their
weapon at you, you simply leap into the air making them miss.
#
HEADBUTT

Usage: headbutt <target>
Stats: STR

This skill causes an incredible surge of hate and anger that allows the
user to inflict damage by smashing his or her head against the target.
Occasionally, headbutt can inflict a very great amount of damage indeed!
After using this command, warriors are dazed for three rounds and unable
to do anything.
#
LODGE

Usage: lodge <target>

By the use of this skill, an attempt is made to duck behind someone who is
fighting on your side, making them the target of the person fighting you.
Your poor friend will not notice that you caused them that trouble. Once
a rogue, always a rogue.
#
"FAST HEALING"

Usage: automatic

Te fast healing skill improves wound healing rates, whether walking, resting,
or sleeping. It represents knowledge of healing herbs or just general 
toughness and stamina. Regeneration will improve as the skill is more
learned.
#
"RESIST MAGIC"

Usage: resist

This skill allows an assassin to prepare him/herself for offensive magical
encounters.  It last for a short period of time, and improves the assassin's
spell resistance by lowering the incoming damage from magic attacks for up
to 33%. 
#
ALERTNESS

Usage: automatic

This is automatic skill, and is checked whenever a thief would be attacked.
If it succeeds, thief will immedately jump away from their aggressive
attacker, making them miss their first strike. It will also give an edge
in the combat, as thief will now strike his/her blows first.
#
TACTICS

Usage: automatic

This skill increases the damage you inflict when fighting monsters you have
already killed before, as this time you will use your knowledge of their weak
spots. Damage increase is as much as 25% percent, depending on how well
the skill is learned. 

"Know your foes' strengths as well as their weaknesses."
#
"FIRST AID"

Usage: first <target>

This skill allows you to restore small amount of target's hitpoints
(more as the skill is improved). The skills uses 20 points of movement
and can be used repeatedly.
#
NERVE

Usage; nerve <target>

This skill allows an assassin to weaken a victim by pressing down on
sensitive pressure points.
#
"MONSTER LORE"

Usage: look <target>

This skill allows the thief to get additional information about the target
monster or player. More information is given as the skill improves.
#  
"WARRIOR CODE"

Over centuries warriors were not known only by their skill in combat,
but their knowledge in things that concern combat. Warrior code is a simple
set of rules that once learned, allow the warrior to understand his position
better. 
In game terms, this skill will allow you to get more information when you
consider opponents. It will also allow you to 'feel' if an item is EGO, just
by looking at it.

See also: CONSIDER EGO  

"My people, once were warriors."
#
"POWER PUSH" "POWER DRAG"                            


Usage: push <person|object> <direction>
       drag <person|object> <direction>
Stats: STR
       
These skills improve your chances of pushing or draging someone/something 
out of the room. In order to drag somone they must be lying on the floor.
#
RETREAT

Skillful ranger, may decide to retreat from the battle when he estimates 
the situation is to dangerous. It is somewhat similar to flee, but you will 
always succeed, won't throw your weapon away and will loose no experience.
Just type 'retreat' when you decide to do so.
#
CURE

Usage: prayfor 'cure' [target]

The single most important aspect of priestly life is the curing of the sick
and the healing of the wounded. Because of this, the first thing a cleric is
taught upon joining the priesthood is how to heal small wounds and bruises. 
As his faith advances he becomes more adept at curing and is able to heal more
severe wounds as well as some diseases. If the priest and the target do not
follow the same deity, cure will not have it's full effect.

Besides simple healing, cure prayer has this additional effects:

Level          Effect
-----          ------
10             Cures drunkness
15             Removes poison
20             Cures blindness
25             Cures plague
                                                                  
                                                                       
"The power of faith is quiet. It is the leaf unmoved by the hurricane."
#
HEAL

Usage       : prayfor 'heal' [target]

Pinnacle of a cleric's early career, this spell heals great amounts of
damage.  By calling of the power of the cleric's god, the cleric
can channel the power of his deity through himself, healing for 100
hitpoints. If the target is somebody else, they will be healed for 75
points if they follow same deity as the priest or for 50 points if not.
#
SPY

Usage: spy <direction>

Spying helps a thief character gain information about the world 
around him/her.  After one has typed 'spy', one can look in various 
directions, and given that there is an exit in that direction, and nothing 
blocking the way (like a closed door), then the contents of the other room 
will be displayed.
#
STEAL

Usage: steal <gold | object > <target>

Use steal to steal gold or items from people. The chance of not getting
caught depends on how well you have practiced steal, and if the person
is asleep.

Due to misuse of the steal command, it is now illegal to steal from other
players.  Doing so will get you a flag for your trouble.

Example:

> steal gold drunk

> steal sword mercenary
  (only possible if he is sleeping)   
  
"The simplest way to make money in the Old world is to take it from
someone else."
#
GOUGE

Usage: gouge <target>

The most nimble and dexterous of thieves, after years of experience
stabbing their opponents, have perfected their aim, and are able to gouge
out their foe's eyes, rendering them blind for the duration of their
lives. In order to perform this correctly, the thief need to wield a 
piercing weapon such as a dagger and  only type 'gouge' followed by the 
name of their foe.
#
"MINOR PROTECTION"

Usage: prayfor 'minor protection' [target]

From the very beginning of their careers, priests learn the subtle ways of
protecting themselves. One of the first protective prayers they will learn
is called 'minor protection'. It will call out to the power of their deity
to protect them, reducing the damage they receive in combat.
If you want to call this prayer on someone else, you must first learn the
next level protection prayer which is 'protection' or your deity will
not answer.

"Keep your chain mail, warrior. I have my own form of protection."
-Halvor Arenson, Kjeldoran priest
#
ILLUMINATION

Usage: prayfor 'illumination'

This prayer calls down for power of your deity to bring light to your
present location. It will stay illuminated for a certain period of time
and then slowly fade.
#
PUNISHMENT

Usage: prayfor 'punishment' [target]

You can have all the protections in the world, but that will not remove your
enemy. Punishment is a quick, but effective prayer, causing damage to your
opponent, proportional to your level.

"Behold! Dare you challange me?"
#
GATE

Usage       : cast 'gate'
 
This spell summons a demon from gate that caster opens  and charms it for a 
certain amount of time depending on characters inteligence and charisma.

Other spells to note: ANIMATE DEAD, CLONE, CONJURE ELEMENTAL
#
PEACE

Usage: prayfor 'peace' 

Using this prayer, you call for peace to your current location. 
It stops all fighting in the room for players and creatures that
are lower elvel then you.
Furthermore it will clear the mobs memory, causing them to forget players
that attacked them.
#
"VOICE OF TRUTH"

Usage: prayfor 'voice of truth' <target>

This prayer acts exactly like 'scroll of identify' for now.
#
REJUVENATE

Usage: prayfor 'rejuvenate' [target]

This prayer will restore target's movement points up to their maximum,
and as well sate victim's hunger and quench their thirst.
#
JUDGMENT

Usage: prayfor 'judgement' [target]

During battle, a priest may call upon this spell to demand that God
pass judgement over their foe. Be warned, those who follow the path
opposite of yours face the might of God in its most potent manifestation.
Even folk who are same side as you may be punished for actions they have
made during their lifetime.
#
AMBIDEXTERITY

Usage: automatic

After years of practice with various weapons you become very adept at using
both hands equally. This skill allows you to wield any weapon in the off-hand
regardless it's weight. Furthermore, you become so trained that you
gain an extra attack with the off-hand.
#
VISIONS

Usage: prayfor 'visions' [target]

This powerful prayer will allow you to see the world through the eyes of
your victim for a brief moment. It will also reveal their inventory and
equipment.
#
"BLINDING LIGHT"

Usage: prayfor 'blinding light'

This prayer asks uses the power of your deity to summon intense light
into your current location. Anyone in that room not grouped with you may
suffer the effects of temporarly blindness.
#
INSPIRATION

Usage: prayfor 'inspiration'

This powerful prayer will inspire both you and your group for combat.
It will boost your hitpoints, energy and movement for a short period of time.
#
"SPIRITUAL ASYLUM"

Usage: prayfor 'spiritual asylum'

One of the most useful prayers in priest's carrier is the spiritual asylum
prayer. Calling upon the power of your deity, you ask to preserve peace on your
current location. The room will become peaceful and no act of harm may be
performed at that location. The prayer lasts for a period of time, defined by
your faith.
#
"SHIELD OF FAITH"

Usage: prayfor 'shield of faith'

This powerful gift is given to only the most faithful priests. An invisible
protective shield will form around you, preserving you from harm. The effect
of the shield is based on your faith, and it will even completly stop
an enemy attack.
#~